Maryland, session 2025, SB0421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–106.
– 1 –

Ch. 158 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) Except as provided by this section, § 1–303 of the Environment Article, and §
8–1815 of the Natural Resources Article, a prosecution for a misdemeanor shall be
instituted within 1 year after the offense was committed.
(JJ) A PROSECUTION FOR A VIOLATION OF § 10–404(A) OR (B) OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE RELATING TO THE DESTRUCTION OF FUNERARY OBJECTS
AND OTHER ELEMENTS OF A CEMETERY SHALL BE INSTITUTED WITHIN 3 YEARS
AFTER THE LOCAL AUTHORITIES IN FACT KNEW OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE
KNOWN OF THE VIOLATION.
Article – Criminal Law
10–404.
(a) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person
may not willfully destroy, damage, deface, or remove:
(i) an associated funerary object or another structure placed in a
cemetery; [or]
(ii) a building, wall, fence, railing, or other work, for the use,
protection, or ornamentation of a cemetery; OR
(III) LANDSCAPING OR ANY OTHER PART OF THE GROUNDS OF A
CEMETERY.
(2) The provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection do not prohibit the
removal of a funerary object or a building, wall, fence, railing, LANDSCAPING, or other
object installed for the use, protection, or ornamentation of a cemetery or burial site, OR
OTHER PART OF THE GROUNDS OF THE CEMETERY for the purpose of repair or
replacement, either at the request of or with the permission of heirs or descendants of the
deceased or the owner or manager of the cemetery or burial site.
(b) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person
may not willfully destroy, damage, or remove a tree, plant, or shrub in a cemetery.
(2) The provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection do not prohibit
normal maintenance of a cemetery or burial site, including trimming of trees and shrubs,
removal of weeds or noxious growths, grass cutting, or other routine care and maintenance.
(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 158
(1) for a violation of subsection (a) of this section, imprisonment not
exceeding 5 years or a fine not exceeding $10,000 or both; and
(2) for a violation of subsection (b) or (c) of this section, imprisonment not
exceeding 2 years or a fine not exceeding $500 or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 3 –